Utah statutes.
16-6a-602.   Number and classes.

(1)  A nonprofit corporation may have:

(a)  one or more classes of voting or nonvoting members; and

(b)  one or more members in each class described in Subsection (1)(a).

(2)  The bylaws may designate:

(a)  the class or classes of members; and

(b)  the qualifications and rights of the members of each class of members including the matters or items for which voting members may vote.

